District of Columbia statutes.
9-907

Police powers.

(a)

The Authority is authorized to establish and maintain a regular police force and to confer police powers to be exercised with respect to offenses occurring on the Authority Facilities upon its employees meeting the minimum requirements of the Commonwealth of Virginia’s Department of Criminal Justice Services.

(b)

Such police officers shall have all powers vested in police officers under Chapter 17 of Title 15.2, and Chapter 11 of Title 16.1, Title 18.2, Title 19.2, and Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia as those titles may be amended from time to time and shall be responsible upon the Authority Facilities and within 300 yards of the Facilities for enforcing the laws of the Commonwealth, the Authority’s rules and regulations, and all other applicable ordinances, rules, and regulations.

(c)

The police officers may issue summons to appear, or arrest on view or on information without warrant as permitted by law, and conduct before any judicial officer of competent jurisdiction any person violating, upon Authority Facilities, any rule or regulation of the Authority, any ordinance or regulation of any local political subdivision, or any other law of the Commonwealth.

(d)

The Department of State Police shall exercise the same powers upon Authority Facilities as elsewhere in the Commonwealth.

(e)

The Authority may enter into reciprocal or mutual aid agreements with a local political subdivision in the National Capital Region, as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 2674(f)(2), those counties with a border abutting the area and any municipality therein, any agency of the Commonwealth, the District of Columbia, the State of Maryland, the federal government, or any combination of the foregoing for cooperation in the furnishing of services during a public service event, an emergency, or planned training, including law enforcement, fire, rescue, emergency health and medical services, transportation, communications, public works and engineering, mass care, and resource support. When responding to a request under such an agreement, Authority employees may go outside Authority facilities, and the Authority and its employees shall have the same immunities from liability as the localities and their employees have in responding under similar circumstances.

(f)

The police force of Arlington County shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the police force established herein at Washington National Airport. The Authority shall enter into an agreement with Arlington County regarding the exercise of police authority.

(g)

The sheriffs and police forces of Loudoun and Fairfax Counties shall continue to exercise concurrent jurisdiction with the police force established herein over the Authority Facilities situated within their respective counties.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 8, 32 DCR 6093
Jul. 25, 1987, D.C. Law 7-18, § 3(e), 34 DCR 3804
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-225, § 2, 46 DCR 485
Jan. 29, 2008, D.C. Law 17-82, § 2, 54 DCR 11887
1981 Ed., § 7-1257.
D.C. Law 17-82 rewrote subsec. (e) which had read as follows: “(e) The Authority may enter into reciprocal or mutual aid agreements with the local political subdivisions in which the Authority Facilities are situated, any agency of the Commonwealth, or of the federal government, or any combination of the foregoing, for cooperation in the furnishing of police services.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of District of Columbia Regional Airports Authority Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-35, October 18, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 10705).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of District of Columbia Regional Airports Authority Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-60, June 21, 2007, 54 DCR 6605).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of District of Columbia Regional Airports Authority Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-153, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10911).